apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="Ab/and__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änn</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Abzebil/d__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Abzebil/d__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Admir/ol__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ol</l>        <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eel</l>       <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Admir/ol__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ol</l>        <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eel</l>       <r>ol<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Afenn/oss__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>oss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Afenn/oss__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>oss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Afferst/ack__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ack</l>       <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äck</l>       <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Afferst/ack__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ack</l>       <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äck</l>       <r>ack<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Afl/oss__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>oss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Afl/oss__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>oss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ëss</l>       <r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Ag/ank__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äng</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ag/ank__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äng</l>       <r>ank<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Agraf/e__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fe</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Agraf/e__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fe</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Akomme/s__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Akomme/s__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Alpdr/am__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eem</l>       <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Alpdr/am__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eem</l>       <r>am<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Alt/or__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>är</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Alt/or__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>är</l>        <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Am/arsch__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>arsch</l>     <r>arsch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärsch</l>     <r>arsch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Am/arsch__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>arsch</l>     <r>arsch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärsch</l>     <r>arsch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Anana/s__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Anana/s__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Antisemi/t__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Antisemi/t__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tte</l>       <r>t<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Appartementsha/us__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iser</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Appartementsha/us__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iser</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="As/az__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>az</l>        <r>az<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätz</l>       <r>az<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="As/az__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>az</l>        <r>az<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätz</l>       <r>az<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Aubergin/e__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Aubergin/e__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Agrafe">          <i>Agraf</i><par n="Agraf/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Agrafe">          <i>agraf</i><par n="Agraf/e__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Akommes">         <i>Akomme</i><par n="Akomme/s__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Akommes">         <i>akomme</i><par n="Akomme/s__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Altor">           <i>Alt</i><par n="Alt/or__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Altor">           <i>alt</i><par n="Alt/or__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Amarsch">         <i>Am</i><par n="Am/arsch__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Amarsch">         <i>am</i><par n="Am/arsch__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Ananas">          <i>Anana</i><par n="Anana/s__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Ananas">          <i>anana</i><par n="Anana/s__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Antisemit">       <i>Antisemi</i><par n="Antisemi/t__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Antisemit">       <i>antisemi</i><par n="Antisemi/t__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Bild">            <i>Bil</i><par n="Abzebil/d__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Bild">            <i>bil</i><par n="Abzebil/d__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Brand">           <i>br</i><par n="Ab/and__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Bus">             <i>Bu</i><par n="Anana/s__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Bus">             <i>bu</i><par n="Anana/s__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Cabine">          <i>Cabin</i><par n="Aubergin/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Cabine">          <i>cabin</i><par n="Aubergin/e__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Cousine">         <i>Cousin</i><par n="Aubergin/e__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Cousine">         <i>cousin</i><par n="Aubergin/e__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Figebam">         <i>Figeb</i><par n="Alpdr/am__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Figebam">         <i>figeb</i><par n="Alpdr/am__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Floss">           <i>Fl</i><par n="Afl/oss__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Floss">           <i>fl</i><par n="Afl/oss__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Frack">           <i>Fr</i><par n="Afferst/ack__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Frack">           <i>fr</i><par n="Afferst/ack__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Gank">            <i>G</i><par n="Ag/ank__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Gank">            <i>g</i><par n="Ag/ank__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Hank">            <i>H</i><par n="Ag/ank__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Hank">            <i>h</i><par n="Ag/ank__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Haus">            <i>Ha</i><par n="Appartementsha/us__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Haus">            <i>ha</i><par n="Appartementsha/us__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Hieselnoss">      <i>Hieseln</i><par n="Afenn/oss__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Hieselnoss">      <i>hieseln</i><par n="Afenn/oss__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Kardinol">        <i>Kardin</i><par n="Admir/ol__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Kardinol">        <i>kardin</i><par n="Admir/ol__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Marsch">          <i>M</i><par n="Am/arsch__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Marsch">          <i>m</i><par n="Am/arsch__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Niewefloss">      <i>Niewefl</i><par n="Afl/oss__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Niewefloss">      <i>niewefl</i><par n="Afl/oss__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Noss">            <i>N</i><par n="Afenn/oss__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Noss">            <i>n</i><par n="Afenn/oss__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Rack">            <i>R</i><par n="Afferst/ack__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Rack">            <i>r</i><par n="Afferst/ack__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Sam">             <i>S</i><par n="Alpdr/am__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Sam">             <i>s</i><par n="Alpdr/am__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Saz">             <i>S</i><par n="As/az__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Saz">             <i>s</i><par n="As/az__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Schluechthaus">   <i>Schluechtha</i><par n="Appartementsha/us__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Schluechthaus">   <i>schluechtha</i><par n="Appartementsha/us__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Stärebild">       <i>Stärebil</i><par n="Abzebil/d__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Stärebild">       <i>stärebil</i><par n="Abzebil/d__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Widderstand">     <i>widderst</i><par n="Ab/and__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Zousaz">          <i>Zous</i><par n="As/az__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Zousaz">          <i>zous</i><par n="As/az__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Zéiwennol">       <i>Zéiwenn</i><par n="Admir/ol__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Zéiwennol">       <i>zéiwenn</i><par n="Admir/ol__n_m_lower"/></e>
